internal_storage/hyphen_dictionaries/hyph_la_classical.dic
x3í4vi1m
xív2i
x3í4vi1t
2x1j
x2l2
2xn
x3ne
x3nĕ
xo2
3xo.
x2o3d
3xon
3x2o1q
xor2í3t
xo1rí
xo4r1n2
x2o4r1q
x2o3ru
x2o4r1v2
3xos
xo4s2a
x2o4s1n2
xo4s2o
x2o4s1q
xo4s1u
x2o4s1v
x2o3t
3x2o3u2
3x2o3v
3xō.
3x2ōn
3x2ō1q
3xō2s
xō4sa
x2ō3t2
3x2ō1u
3x2ō1v
xṓ4r2a1t
x2ō2́
xṓ1r
xṓr2a
xṓ4r2ān
xṓ1rā
xṓ4ră1t
xṓ4rer
xṓr2e
xṓ4r2e1t
xṓ4r2ĕr
xṓ3rĕ
xṓ4r2ĕ1t
x3ṓ4ro
x3ṓ4rŏ
x3ṓ2r1s2
xṓ4s
x3ṓ1sa
x3ṓ1sā
x3ṓ1să
x3ṓ1s2æ1
x3ṓ1sǣ1
x3ṓ2s1c
x3ṓ1se
x3ṓ1sē
x3ṓ1s2ĕ
x3ṓ1sī
x3ṓ1sō
x5ṓ1s2um
xṓs1u
x5ṓ1s2us
x3ṓ1sŭ
xŏ2
2x2ŏ3d
xŏ́2n
xŏ2́
xó4ne1r
x2ó1n
xó1ne
xó4r2a1t
xó1ra
xó4rer
xó1re
xó4r2e1t
xó4riē
xó1ri
xó4ror
xó1ro
xó2s
xó4sa
x2ó1t
2x1p
x3pé
2x1q
x3q2u2
2xs2
x3s1p2
xs4p2e
xsu4lu
xs1u
x1s2u1l
xsup2e3
x3s2u1p
2x1t
x3t2a
x3t2ā
x3tă
x3tá
x3t2æ1
x3t2ǣ1
x3tǽ1
x3t2e1
xter4a
xte5re
xt2e5ré
xter5i5u2e1
xt2eri4u
xt2er3i5v
xt2e5rī
xte4r3ī5u2
xte4r3ī5v
x3t2ĕ
xtĕ3r4a
xtĕ3r1ǣ2
xt4ĕ3rĕ
xt4ĕ5rī
xtĕ4r3ī5u2
xtĕ4r3ī5v
xtĕ3rŭ
x1téri5t
xté1r
x3t2i1
x3tī
x3t2ĭ
x3tí
x3t2o
x3t2ō
x3tó
x3t2r2
x3tu
x3tū1
x3tŭ
x3tú
xu2
3xu.
2x3ue.
xu2e1
x3ue1v
2x3u2ĕ
x2ui.
x2u2is
x2u2ī
x2u2ís
xu2í
3x2um
x2u1m2e
xu2m2ī2
x2u4m1n2
x2u4m1q
x2u4m1v2
x2u1ne
xu1r
x2u3r2o
3x3us
x4us.
x4u4s1n2
x4u4s3q
x4u4s1u
x4u4s1v
x2u2um1
xu1u
x2uúm1
xū2b2
xū1
xūbe3
x2ū1ne
x2ū1nĕ
xū2r2e
xū2rē
xū2r2ĕ
xū2r2é
xū2r2i
xū2r2ĭ
xū2rí
xū2ro2
xū2rŏ
xū2ró2
x2ū2s
xū2t2
xū́2b2
xū2́
xū́4rē
xū́1r
xū́4ri
xū́4rĭ
xū́4ro
xū́4rŏ
x2ū́s
xū́2t
xŭ2
2xŭā
2xŭă
x2ŭī
2xŭ1l
x2ŭm1
xŭ3m2ā
xŭ3mă2
xŭ3mē
xŭ3m2ĕ
xŭ3m2ī2
xŭ3mŭ
2xŭō
2xŭŏ
x2ŭŭm1
xŭ́4l
xŭ́2
x2ŭ4́m
xú2b
xú2l
x2úm1
x2ú1ne
xú1r1
x2ús3q
xú2t
xú2ui
xú1u
xú2v2i
xú1v
2x1v
x3ve1
x3v2ĕ
1x2x2
y2a
ya1d2
ya1m
y2a2n2u
yā2nu
yá2nu
y1b2
ybe2
ybē2
ybé2
yb2é4i
y1d2
yda3m
yde2s
ydē2
ye2
yes3
yē2
yé2
yés3
y2g3n2
y1g
y2i
yi2i
yi1n2
y2io2s
yio1
yis3
y2i4s1c
yis5c2i
yl3ui
y1l
yl3u2í
y1m
ym2a
y1m2e
yme3d2
yme5de
y1n
y1n2ā
y1ne2
y1n2i
yo3n2e
y2o3ni
yó1
ype1r4í
y1p
yp2e
yper1
y1r
yr2a
y3r2á
yr4ás
y1s2i
yst2a4
ys1t
yst2e3
y1s1u
yte3r
y1t
yt2e
yter5i5u2e1
yt2eri4u
yt2er3i5v
yt2e5rī
yte4r3ī5u2
yte4r3ī5v
yx4e2u
y1x1
yx2e1
y2xu2
ȳ1
ȳ2a
ȳa1d2
ȳ2ă
ȳă1d2
ȳ2á
ȳ2i
ȳ2ĭ
ȳ2í
ȳló2
ȳ1l
ȳmo3
ȳn2
ȳ1ne2
ȳ3rē
ȳ1ré2
ȳro2
ȳ1ró2
ȳs2
ȳ1s2o2
ȳ1s2ó2
ȳ2́
ȳ́3l
ȳ́1n
ý2a1
ý1b2
ý1d2
ýda3
ý2g3n2
ý1g
ý2i
ý2l1u
ý1l
ý1m
ý1m2e
ý1nu
ý1r
ý1s2i
ýst2e3
ýs1t
ýt2e1
ý1t
ý2th
ýx4e2u
ý1x1
ýx2e1
ý2xu2
1z
z2a
za1b2
za3r
ză3r
zá1m1
ze3b2
z2é2ru
zé1r
z2i
zmă3
zo1
zo2s
zū2
̄1
̄2a
̄a2m
̄2ā
̄2ă
̄2á
̄2ǣ1
̄2ǣ2ŭ
̄1b2
̄be3
̄bī3u2
̄b1ī
̄bī3v
̄3bu
̄3bŭ
̄c2e2
̄1c
̄2c2l2
̄2cū1
̄de3
̄1d
̄dĕ3r
̄2dī
̄2e
̄2ē
̄ēn3
̄2ĕ
̄2f
̄2i
̄2ī
̄2ĭ
̄2í
̄n2
̄1no3
̄2ō
̄p2e3
̄1p
̄per2
̄pĕ3r
̄p2ĕ
̄pĕ5rĭ
̄r2
̄2s
̄t2o2
̄1t
̄2u
̄2ŭ
̄2ú
̄2́
̄́3b2
̄́2c2l2
̄́1c
̄́3l
̄́1n
̄́2s
̆ă1d2
̆1b2
̆1d2
̆dă3m
̆dē2
̆ĕs3
̆2g1n2
̆1g
̆2ĭ
̆2ĭ2ă
̆ĭn2
̆2ĭs3
̆2lu
̆1l
̆1ma
̆1mă
̆1m2e
̆1m2ĕ
̆1n
̆1n2ā
̆1ra
̆3r2ă
̆1ræ1
̆1rǣ1
̆1rī
̆1rō
̆1rŏ
̆r1sĭ3
̆2r1s2
̆1rŭ
̆st2ă4
̆s1t
̆t4ĕ5rī
̆1t
̆t2ĕ
̆tĕ4r3ī5u2
̆tĕ4r3ī5v
̆tĕ3rŭ
̆2th
̆3thĭ
̆1x2
̆2xu2
̆́1b2
̆́1d2
̆́dă3
̆́1m2ĕ
͞e1
͞ea2b3
͞eắ2
͞e1ă
͞e2á2
͞e3á1c
͞e3á1p
͞e3b2
͞e4cu2e1
͞2e1c
͞e3d2
͞ed4o
͞e2eō
͞2e1e2
͞e3es
͞2eé2
͞e3és
͞e3g2
͞2e1i2
͞e2iā
͞e3i1c
͞e2i2ī
͞2e2ī
͞e2ō
͞e2ó2
͞ep2e3
͞e1p
͞epot2e4
͞ep2o
͞epo1t
͞epo4t5er
͞epo4t5es
͞epo6t5és
͞epó4t5e
͞epó1t
͞e3q
͞e3r
͞es4c2a
͞es1c
͞es4cá
͞es4c2i
͞es4cí
͞e4scu
͞e4scú
͞e4spō
͞e1s2p2
͞2e2s1q
͞es4t2a
͞es1t
͞es4t2ā
͞es4tá
͞es4t2e
͞es4t2ē
͞es4té
͞es4ti1n
͞est2i
͞es2ti5t4
͞es4tī
͞estí3
͞es4tí1t4
͞es4tō.
͞est2ō
͞es4tōn
͞es4t2ō1q
͞es4tōs
͞es4t2ō1u
͞es4t2ō1v
͞es4t1rú
͞est2r2
͞e5ter
͞2e1t
͞et2e
͞ete6r2e6ri
͞ete1re
͞ete6r2e6rí
͞ete6r5es
͞ete6r5és
͞et2e1ré
͞ete5ri1m
͞ete5r2it2i
͞e1teri1t
͞ete5r2ití
͞ete5rit2o
͞ete5ritó
͞ete5r6i5tur
͞eteri4tu
͞ete5ritúr1
͞et2e4r5ī4
͞eterī2́6
͞e1te6r2í1t
͞ete1rí
͞e5tĕr
͞et2ĕ
͞eté6r5es
͞eté1r
͞et2ére
͞eté6rit2e
͞etéri1t
͞2e3u1t
͞e1u
͞e1x2
͞e2xu2
͞2u1
͞u2a
͞u2ǣ1
͞u3b2
͞u3d2o
͞2u1d
͞u2ō2
͞upe5re
͞2u1p
͞up2e
͞uper1
͞upe5ri4
͞up2e5r4ī4
͞upe2rī5n
͞uper2ī5q
͞uper2ī5u2
͞uper2ī5v
͞u2s1u
͞2us
͞u3s2um
͞2u3s2us
͞u2xu3
͞u1x2
́͞2
͡e1
͡ea2b3
͡eắ2
͡e1ă
͡e3á1c
͡e2á
͡e3á1p
͡e3b2
͡e4cu2e1
͡2e1c
͡e3d2
͡ed4o
͡e2eo
͡2e1e2
͡e2eō
͡e2e2ó
͡e3es
͡eé2r
͡2eé
͡e3és
͡e3g2
͡2e1i2
͡e2iā
͡e3i1c
͡e2i2i
͡e2i2ī
͡e2ií
͡2e2ī
͡e2o
͡e2ō
͡ep2e3
͡e1p
͡epo6tés
͡ep2o
͡epo1t
͡epó6tes
͡epó1t
͡epót2e
͡e3q
͡e3r
͡er4i
͡es4c2a
͡es1c
͡es4cá
͡e5s4c2i
͡es4cí
͡e4scu
͡e4scú
͡e4spō
͡e1s2p2
͡2e2s1q
͡es4t2a
͡es1t
͡es4t2ā
͡es4tá
͡es4t2e
͡es4t2ē
͡es4té
͡es4ti.
͡est2i
͡es4ti1g
͡es4ti1n
͡es4ti3q
͡es4ti2s
͡es2ti5t4
͡es4ti1v
͡es4tī
͡es4tí1g
͡es4tín
͡es4tí3q
͡es4t2í2s
͡es4tí5t4
͡es4tí1u2
͡es4tí1v
͡es4to.
͡est2o
͡es4ton
͡es4t2o1q
͡es4tos
͡es4t2o1u2
͡es4t2o1v
͡es4tō.
͡est2ō
͡es4tōn
͡es4t2ō1q
͡es4tōs
͡es4t2ō1u
͡es4t2ō1v
͡es4t2ó1n
͡es4t2ó1q
͡es4tós
͡es4t2ó1u2
͡es4t2ó1v
͡es4t1rú
͡est2r2
͡e5ter
͡2e1t
͡et2e
͡ete6r2e6ri
͡ete1re
͡ete6r2e6rí
͡ete4ri4
͡eter5ii
͡eter5ií
͡et2e4r5ī4
͡eterī2́6
͡ete4rí4
͡eter5ímu
͡eter5ít2i
͡e1ter2í1t
͡e5tĕr
͡et2ĕ
͡eté6ri.
͡eté1r
͡eté6r5ii
͡eté6r5is
͡eté6rit2e
͡e1téri1t
͡eté6r2i6t2i
͡e3us1t
͡e1u
͡2e2us
͡2e3u1t
͡e1x2
͡e2xu2
͡2u1
͡u2a
͡u3b2
͡u3d2o
͡2u1d
͡u2ō2
͡u2ó2
͡upe5re
͡2u1p
͡up2e
͡uper1
͡upe5ri4
͡up2eri5n
͡up2e3r2i5q
͡uperi5u2e1
͡up2eriu
͡up2eri5v
͡up2e5r4ī4
͡upe2rī5n
͡uper2ī5q
͡uper2ī5u2
͡uper2ī5v
͡u2xu3
͡u1x2
́͡2
́2ă
́ă1d2
́1ă3g
́b2a
́1b
́b1a3q
́3bas
́b2ă
́4bă2c
́bă2r
́b3ă1rā
́b3ă1r2ă
́b3ă1rē
́b3ă1r2ĕ
́b3ă1rō
́3băs
́b2e
́be3r
́b2ē
́b4ĭă
́bĭ4c2ŭ
́b1ĭ2c
́b4ĭē2s
́b1ĭē
́2b1ĭĭ
́b4ĭō
́b4ĭŭ2
́b2o3
́b2ŏ1
́b5ŏl2ĕn
́bŏ2l
́bŏl2ĕ
́2bri
́br2
́b2rī
́b2s2q
́2b1s
́b5s4t2ĕ
́bs1t
́b2s1u
́b2u
́3bŭm1
́2b2y
́3c2ă
́1c
́c2e1
́3cē
́3c2i
́cŏ3
́2cre
́c2r2
́2c1rē
́2cri
́2c3u2e1
́2c3u2t
́3cŭ3m1
́c2ŭ
́2c3ŭ2t
́dă2m
́1d
́d3ă1mă
́de4run
́de1r
́2d3ĕ2d2
́2d4ĕ1p
́d3ĕs1t
́2d3i2g
́d2i1n
́d2ĭ
́2d3ĭ2g
́4d3ĭ1m2ĭ
́dĭ1m
́d3ŏ2l
́d2rē
́dr2
́d2rŏ
́2d3u2e1
́2dū1
́d2ŭ
́e2ă
́e3b2
́e4cu2e1
́2e1c
́e3d2
́e2eo
́2e1e2
́e2eō
́e3es
́e3g2
́2e1i2
́e4ia.
́ei2a
́e4iam
́e4ias
́e4i2a2͞
́e2iā
́e2i2i
́e2i2ī
́ep2e3
́e1p
́e3q
́e1r
́er4i
́e3s4c2a
́es1c
́e3s4c2i
́e3s4t2a
́es1t
́e5s4tā.
́est2ā
́e5s4tān
́e3s4t2e
́e3s4t2ē
́e5s4ti.
́est2i
́e5s4ti1n
́e5s4ti2s
́e5s2ti3t2
́e3s4tī
́e5s4to.
́est2o
́e5s4tos
́e3s4t2ō
́es5tră
́est2r2
́e5s4tru
́e2s3tu
́ete3r
́2e1t
́et2e
́etĕ5r
́et2ĕ
́2e3u1t
́e1u
́e2ŭ
́e2x1
́ĕ1
́1ĕ2ā
́1ĕ2ă
́ĕ2mŏ
́2ĕ1q
́4ĕr.
́1ĕ2s
́1ĕ2ŭ2
́fe1
́1f
́2fē
́fĕ1
́fŏ1
́3g2a
́1g
́3gă
́3g1æ2
́3g1ǣ2
́g2ĕ1
́2g1l
́2g1n2
́g3no
́2gŭa
́2gŭā
́2gŭă
́2gŭǣ1
́2gŭē
́2gŭĕ
́2gŭō
́2gŭŭ
́1h
́2h2e
́3ian
́3i2a1q
́3ia1r
́3i2a1t
́3i2a1u
́3i2a1v
́i2ā
́i3b2
́i2c2i
́i1c
́3i2e1m
́3ien
́3i2e1q
́3i2e1t
́3i2e1u
́3i2e1v
́3iē2s
́1ii
́1io1
́3iun
́3iu1u
́ĭ3b
́ĭ2c2ĭ
́ĭ1c
́1ĭĭ
́2ĭn2
́3ĭn.
́3l2ă
́1l
́2le1g
́l2e
́3l2ĕ
́4lĕ1g
́4lĕ1p
́3l2i1x2
́l2i
́2lu
́3l2u3b2
́l3u2e1
́l3uē
́3lui
́3l2um
́3l2us
́1m2a
́1mă
́m1ă2g
́m3ă1r2ă
́m3ă4rō
́m3bă
́2m1b
́m4b2ĭā
́m4b3ĭŏ
́1m2e
́4me3ra
́m2er
́4me1rā
́2mĕ4d4ĭ
́1mĕ
́m1ĕ1d2
́4m2ĕdŏ2
́m2i1n
́1mi
́4minē.
́mi1nē
́4minēn
́1m2ĭ
́4mĭăn
́m2ĭ1ă
́4mĭ2ă1t
́4mĭēn
́4mĭē2s
́4mĭ4ĕn
́4mĭĕ1t
́2mĭĭ
́4mĭnē.
́mĭ1nē
́4mĭnēn
́4mĭŭn
́3m2ĭŭ2
́1mo1
́1mŏ1
́mpĕ5r
́2m1p
́mp2ĕ
́mp2ĕ1r6ī
́2mun
́3m2ū1
́1n2ā
́1n2ă
́n3dĕ
́2n1d
́n4d3ĭ2g
́n4d3ŏ4l
́n4dŭĕ
́n3d3ŭ2ĭ
́1n2ĕ
́n3ĕs3t
́2n3g2
́4n3ĭc2ĭ
́1nĭ
́nĭ1c
́1n2o
́1nŏ1
́n1s2c
́2ns
́n4si2g
́n1si
́ns5i4t2æ1
́nsi1t
́ns5i4tu
́n4sĭ2g
́n1sĭ
́ntĕ3r
́2n1t
́nt2ĕ
́nt5ĕ4rōs
́ntĕ1rō
́3n2ua
́1n2u2ā
́3n2uē
́3n2u2ī
́1n2ū1
́1n2ŭ
́o1
́2ŏ
́ŏ3p
́3pă
́1p
́p2e1
́pe3r1
́pĕ3r
́p2ĕ
́pĕ5rĭ
́3p2i
́3pĭ
́3p2l2
́2p1n2
́p2ŏ3
́3p2r2
́pu3l
́p2u
́3pŭī
́p2ŭ
́3pŭ2ĭ
́1r
́r2a
́r1a3g
́4r2ă1b1
́ră4gā
́2r1ă1g
́ră4gă
́ră4g2ĭ
́2r2ă1l
́2r3c2
́r2e
́3rē.
́1rē
́2r3ĕ2d4
́2r1ĕ2g2
́rĕ2m
́2r3ĕ1m2ā
́4r3ĕ1mă
́2r3ĕ1mē
́2r3ĕ1mĕ
́2r3ĕ1mī
́2r3ĕ1mĭ
́4r3ĕ1mō
́2r3ĕ1mŏ
́2r3ĕ1mŭ
́2r3ĕ1s
́2r1h
́rĭ4bē
́1rĭ
́rĭ1b
́rĭ4bĕ
́2r3ĭ4c2ĭ
́r2ĭ1c
́rĭ4m2ăn
́rĭ1m
́4rĭ4măr
́4rĭ4m2ă1t
́4r3ĭ4mē
́rĭ4mĕ
́4r3ĭ4m2ĭ
́2r3ĭ4mŏ
́4r5ĭ4mŭn
́rĭ1mŭ
́3r2ĭŭ2
́2ro1g2
́2rŏ1g2
́2r3ŏ1p
́r3ua
́r3u2ā
́2r3uæ1
́2r1u2e1
́r3uē
́r2ui
́1r2u3m
́r3u2ō
́3rū1
́2s1c
́3s4ci1d
́sc2i
́s3c2r2
́1s2ĕ
́s4ĕr
́3s1ĕŭ2
́1s2i
́2s3ĭ2c
́1sĭ
́s4per1
́s1p2
́sp2e
́sp2ĕ3
́2s5pĕ2s
́s3pī
́s3q
́s4tes
́s1t
́st2e
́s3ti3b2
́st2i
́3s4ti1n
́3s2ti3t2
́5stĭt2ē
́s2tĭ1t
́st2ĭ
́5stĭt2ĕn
́stĭt2ĕ
́s4tr2a1t
́st2r2
́s4tr2e1t
́s5tri
́3s4trŏ
́3s4tru
́s5t1r2um
́s4trŭā
́s4trŭă
́s4trŭē
́s4trŭĕ
́s4trŭī
́s4trŭō
́s4trŭŭ
́1s3ui
́s1u
́3s2umu
́1s2um
́3s2un
́4t1ă2g
́1t
́te3r
́t2e
́3t2ĕ2ī
́t2ĕ
́tĕ3r1a
́t6ĕ5ră.
́tĕ1ră2
́2t3ĕs
́3th2a
́3thā
́3th2ă
́3thæ1
́3thǣ1
́3t2ĭ
́4t2ĭ1q
́2t2l
́t2o1
́t2ŏ1
́5trī1x2
́t2r2
́1u
́2u1m
́2un
́1u2ŏ1
́up2e3
́2u1p
́upe5r1
́u1r
́u2xu3
́u1x2
́1ūn
́ū1
́ŭ2
́1ŭ1b
́1ŭ1t
́vŏ1
́1v
́x2a
́1x1
́x2ă
́x4e2u
́x2e1
́x2ĕ
́x3ĕ2ăn
́xĕ2ă
́x2i
́2x2ia
́2x2iā
́2x2i2æ1
́2x2i2ǣ1
́2xiē
́2xi2ī
́2x2i2ō
́2xiu
́x2ī
́x2ĭ2n
́x2o2
́x2ō
́x2ŏ2
́x3t2ĕ3
́2x1t
́2xu2
́3x4us
́x2ŭ2ĭ
́xŭ2
́x3ŭ2ĭs
